Hawaii statutes.
§39-4 Details of bonds. (a) All bonds
issued pursuant to this part shall bear interest at such rate or rates, payable
at such time or times as determined in accordance with this part; shall mature
and be payable at such time or times from the date of the issue thereof as will
comply with the provisions of the Constitution of the State; may be made
payable as to both principal and interest at a place or places within or
without the State; may be issued in coupon form without privilege of
registration or registrable as to principal only or as to both principal and
interest or in fully registrable form without coupons; may be made registrable
at a place or places within or without the State; may be subject to redemption,
to tenders for purchase or to purchase prior to their stated maturity at the
option of the State, or the holder, or both.

(b) The director of finance shall determine
the date, denomination or denominations, interest payment dates, maturity date
or dates, place or places and manner of payment, registration privileges and
place or places of registration, redemption price or prices and time or times
and terms and conditions and method of redemption, the right of the holder to
tender for purchase and the price or prices and time or times and terms and
conditions upon which the right might be exercised, the right to purchase and
the price or prices and the time or times and terms and conditions upon which
the right may be exercised and the purchase may be made, and all other details
of bonds issued under this part.

The principal of and interest and premium, if
any, on all bonds issued under this part shall be payable in any coin or
currency of the United States of America, which at the time of payment is legal
tender for public and private debts. [L 1988, c 28, pt of §3; am L 1989, c 15,
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next